Tables/ipa.ctb
always ʼ 5-3		# apostrophe                   401 ejective
always  ̥ 6-1246		# ring below                   402 voiceless
always  ̊ 4-1246		# ring above                   402 voiceless
always  ̬ 6-236		# wedge below                  403 voiced
always ʰ 4-125		# superscript h                404 aspirated
always  ̤ 6-25		# umlaut below                 405 breathy voiced
always  ̰ 6-12456	# tilde below                  406 creaky voiced
always  ̼ 6-12346	# seagull below                407 linguolabial
always  ̪ 6-1456		# bridge below                 408 dental
always  ̺ 6-235-1456	# inverted bridge below       409 apical
always  ̻ 6-2356		# square below                 410 laminal
always  ̹ 6-135		# right half-ring below        411 more rounded
always  ̜ 6-246		# left half-ring below         412 less rounded
always  ̟ 6-346		# plus below                   413 advanced
always  ̠ 6-36		# minus below                  414 retracted
always  ̈ 4-25		# umlaut above                 415 centralized
always  ̽ 4-1346		# over-cross above             416 mid-centralized
always  ̘ 6-156		# advancing sign below         417 advanced tongue root
always  ̙ 6-234		# retracting sign below        418 retracted tongue root
always ˞ 5-1235		# right hook                   419 rhotacized
always ʷ 4-2456		# superscript w                420 labialized
always ʲ 4-245		# superscript j                421 palatalized
always ˠ 4-46-1245	# superscript gamma           422 velarized
always ˤ 4-235-23	# superscript reversed glottal stop 423 pharyngealized
always  ̃ 4-12456	# tiled above                  424 nasalized
always ⁿ 4-1345		# superscript n                425 nasal release
always ˡ 4-123		# superscript l                426 lateral release
always  ̚ 4-145		# corner above                 427 no audible release
always  ̴ 5-12456	# superimposed tilde           428 velarized or pharyngealized
always  ̝ 6-345		# raising sign below           429 raised
always  ̞ 6-126		# lowering sign below          430 lowered
always  ̩ 6-23		# vertical line below          431 syllabic
always  ̯ 6-23456	# arch below                   432 non-syllabic
always  ͡ 5		# top tie bar                  433 double articulation
always , 2		# comma                        491 (punctuation)

always ˈ 456-12		# vertical stroke (superior)   501 (primary) stress mark
always ˌ 456-23		# vertical stroke (inferior)   502 secondary stress mark
always ː 25		# length mark                  503 length mark
always ˑ 5-2		# half-length mark             504 half-length
always  ̆ 4-12356	# breve above                  505 extra-short
always . 3		# period                       506 syllable break
always | 456-1256	# vertical line                507 minor (foot) group
always ‖ 456-123456	# double vertical line         508 major (intonation) group
always ‿ 456-123	# bottom tie bar               509 linking (absence of a break)
always ↗ 456-145	# upward diagonal arrow        510 global rise
always ↘ 456-356	# downward diagonal arrow      511 global fall
always  ̋ 4-6-34		# double acute accent above   512 extra high tone
always  ́ 4-34		# acute accent above           513 high tone
always  ̄ 4-14		# macron above                 514 mid tone
always  ̀ 4-16		# grave accent above           515 low tone
always  ̏ 4-6-16		# double grave accent above   516 extra low tone
always ↓ 456-2346	# down arrow                   517 downstep
always ↑ 456-1246	# up arrow                     518 upstep
always ˥ 456-4-14	# extra-high tone bar (55)    519 extra hight tone
always ˦ 456-14		# high tone bar (44)           520 hight tone
always ˧ 456-25		# mid tone bar (33)            521 mid tone
always ˨ 456-36		# low tone bar (22)            522 low tone
always ˩ 456-6-36	# extra-low tone bar (11)     523 extra low tone
always  ̌ 4-236		# wedge above                  524 rising tone
#          456-34	# rising tone bar (15)             rising tone
always  ̂ 4-146		# circumflex above             525 falling tone
#          456-16	# falling tone bar (15)            falling tone
always  4-24		# macro-acute above            526 high-rising tone
#          456-24	# high-rising tone bar (35)        high-rising tone
always  4-35		# grave-macro above            527 low-rising tone
#          456-35	# low-rising tone bar (13)         low-rising tone
always  4-256		# grave-acute-grave above      528 rising-falling tone

# also used for switch into/out into/out of phonetic code.
always [ 45-12356	# left square bracket          901 opening phonetic brackets
always ] 45-23456	# right square bracket         902 closing phonetic brackets

always / 45-34		# slash                            phonemic enclosure
always → 456-135	# rightward arrow                  becomes (is realized as)
always - 36		# hyphen (dash)                    (punctuation)

# 56		# The following symbol is non-IPA and should be read in accordance with the primary braille code of the document
# 56-56		# The following passage is non-IPA and should be read in accordance with the primary braille code of the document
# 56-23		# Terminates a passage of non-IPA texte (opened by 56-56); return to IPA code
